tools/fst/lexicon.lexc
LEXICON Pronouns
kina+1p:kina NounContinuations ;

! "ivvit" spelling variant of "igvit"/1p ("you"), found by the same
! systematic root sweep as the Nouns block above -- a third spelling
! alongside the two already bulk-generated ("igvit"/"ipvit").
igvit+1p:ivvit NounContinuations ;

! "taapsu"/rpd-sc-s (root-taking-an-ending form behind "taamna"/
! pd-sc-s "this one right here") is attested with "taass"/"taats"
! spelling variants too (e.g. "taassuma"/"taatsuma" alongside canonical
! "taapsu"+"ma"/tpd-gen-s) -- same free-variation treatment as
! "tagv"/rad-sc above.
taapsu+rpd-sc-s:taassu TpdEndings ;
taapsu+rpd-sc-s:taatsu TpdEndings ;

! "tamaksu"/rpd-ml-s (a sibling root, same alternation) gets the same
! "ss"-spelled variant: "tamassuminga"/"tamassumunga" alongside
! canonical "tamaksu"+"minga"/"munga".
tamaksu+rpd-ml-s:tamassu TpdEndings ;

! Six more demonstrative spelling variants, all found the same
! systematic way (a sweep comparing every gold demonstrative word
! against every currently-wired spelling combination, instead of
! chasing individual sub-clusters): "taanna"/"tanna" variants of
! "taamna"/pd-sc-s ("this one right here", standalone); "taikua"
! variant of "taikkua"/pd-sc-p (single vs double "k"); "tainna"
! variant of "taingna"/pd-sc-s (the same "ngn"->"nn"-family
! simplification already seen for "kanangnaq"->"kanannaq"); "taissu"/
! "taitsu" variants of "taiksu"/rpd-sc-s (the same "ksu"->"ssu"/"tsu"
! alternation already confirmed for "taapsu"/"tamaksu" above -- a
! genuinely recurring pattern across every "-ksu"-final demonstrative
! root, not a one-off); "takkua" variant of "taakkua"/pd-sc-p (single
! vs double "a"); "taqqakku" variant of "taqqapku"/rpd-mlsc-p (p->k,
! matching the pku/kku split already visible as separate lexical items
! elsewhere in the generated demonstrative set).
taamna+pd-sc-s:taanna # ;
taamna+pd-sc-s:taanna QParticles ;
taamna+pd-sc-s:tanna # ;
taamna+pd-sc-s:tanna QParticles ;
taikkua+pd-sc-p:taikua # ;
taikkua+pd-sc-p:taikua QParticles ;
taingna+pd-sc-s:tainna # ;
taingna+pd-sc-s:tainna QParticles ;
taiksu+rpd-sc-s:taissu TpdEndings ;
taiksu+rpd-sc-s:taitsu TpdEndings ;
taakkua+pd-sc-p:takkua # ;
taakkua+pd-sc-p:takkua QParticles ;
taqqapku+rpd-mlsc-p:taqqakku TpdEndings ;

! "manna"/pd-ml-s (bulk-generated in demonstratives-generated.lexc,
! never hand-edited) only ever continued to "#"/QParticles -- gold
! attests it ALSO taking "u"/1nv ("mannaujuq" = manna+u+juq), the same
! "every X-producing morpheme should reach its full continuation set"
! gap already found and fixed for several other roots this session.
! Hand-added here as a parallel path rather than touching the
! generator (scoped to this one word, not re-checked against every
! other demonstrative root), confirmed via the real Java analyzer's
! own output before wiring.
manna+pd-ml-s:manna NvSuffixes ;
